Illinois, session 104th, SB3675.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 51A-12 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/1A-12 new)7    Sec. 1A-12. Education funding study. The Board, in 8cooperation with the Department of Revenue, shall conduct an 9education funding reform study, with a goal of adopting a 10system that controls costs while creating a more equitable 11funding system. In particular, the Board shall study the 12feasibility of creating a statewide shared funding system 13where local school districts propose budgets, which are 14approved by voters and funded by a statewide property tax fund 15in lieu of property taxes. The Board shall submit its report to 16the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1731, 2026 and shall include any proposed statutory changes 18needed to effectuate a transition to a new funding system. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.